Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1.5
STATEWIDE ENROLLMENT PLAN

23-1.5-101 to 23-1.5-103. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article repealed, p. 1483, § 30, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1994 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2008. For the text of this article prior to 2008, consult the 2007 Colorado Revised Statutes.